Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2607
Rules and regulations; promulgation.

The department may promulgate rules governing the materials, location, planting, construction, and maintenance for the screening or fencing required by the provisions of sections 39-2601 to 39-2612.

Laws 1971, LB 398, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 30.